pl: Efekt odbicia lub świecenia: Świecące w ciemności; LED/podświetlane; Brak efektu; Odblaskowe; Inne
pt-BR: Refletivo ou brilho efeito: Brilha no escuro; LED/iluminado; Sem efeito; Reflexivo; Outro
sv: Reflekterande eller glödande effekt: Självlysande; LED/upplysande; Ingen effekt; Reflekterande; Övrigt
vi: Hiệu ứng phản chiếu hoặc phát sáng: Dạ quang; Đèn LED/Phát sáng; Không có hiệu ứng; Phản quang; Khác
nl: Reflecterend of glow-effect: Glow-in-the-dark; LED/lichtgevend; Geen effect; Reflecterend; Overig
th: เอฟเฟกต์สะท้อนแสงหรือเรืองแสง: เรืองแสงในที่มืด; LED/มีไฟ; ไม่มีเอฟเฟกต์; สะท้อนแสง; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Odsevni ali sijoči učinek: Sveti v temi; LED/svetleče; Brez učinka; Odsevno; Drugo
zh-CN: 反光或夜光效果: 夜光; LED/发光; 无效果; 反光; 其他
tr: Yansıtıcı veya karanlıkta parlayan etki: Karanlıkta parlayan; LED/ışıklı; Efekt yok; Yansıtıcı; Diğer
ja: 反射効果または発光効果: 蓄光; LED/ライトアップ; エフェクトなし; 反射; その他
en: Reflective or glow effect: Glow-in-the-dark; LED/light-up; No effect; Reflective; Other
fi: Heijastava tai hehkuva vaikutus: Pimeässä hohtava; LED/valaistu; Ei tehostetta; Heijastava; Muu
pt-PT: Efeito refletor ou brilhante: Brilha no escuro; LED/luminoso; Sem efeito; Refletor; Outro
ro-RO: Efect reflectorizant sau strălucitor: Fosforescent; LED/Luminos; Fără efect; Reflectorizant; Altele
cs: Reflexní nebo zářivý efekt: Svítící ve tmě; LED/svítící; Bez efektu; Reflexní; Ostatní
de: Reflektierender oder leuchtender Effekt: Im Dunkeln leuchtend; LED/Leuchtend; Kein Effekt; Reflektierend; Sonstige
zh-TW: 反光或發光效果: 夜光; LED/發光; 無效果; 反光; 其他
ru: Светоотражающий или светящийся эффект: Светящийся в темноте; LED/с подсветкой; Без эффекта; Светоотражающий; Другое
bg-BG: Отразяващ или светещ ефект: Светещо в тъмното; LED/светещо; Без ефект; Светлоотразително; Други
el: Αντανακλαστικό ή φωσφορίζον εφέ: Φωσφορίζον; LED/φωτιζόμενο; Κανένα εφέ; Ανακλαστικό; Άλλο
it: Effetto riflettente o luminoso: Fosforescente; LED/Luminoso; Nessun effetto; Riflettente; Altro
fr: Effet réfléchissant ou lumineux: Phosphorescent; LED/lumineux; Aucun effet; Réfléchissant; Autre
hr-HR: Reflektirajući ili sjajni efekt: Svijetli u mraku; LED/svijetleće; Bez efekta; Reflektirajuće; Ostalo
ko: 반사 또는 발광 효과: 야광; LED/발광; 효과 없음; 반사; 기타
da: Refleks- eller glødeeffekt: Selvlysende; LED/lys; Ingen effekt; Reflekterende; Andet
hu: Fényvisszaverő vagy világító hatás: Sötétben világító; LED/világító; Effektus nélküli; Fényvisszaverő; Egyéb
lt-LT: Atspindintis arba švytintis efektas: Švytintis tamsoje; LED / šviečiantis; Be efekto; Atspindintis; Kitas
es: Efecto reflectante o luminoso: Brilla en la oscuridad; LED/luminoso; Sin efecto; Reflectante; Otro
sk-SK: Reflexný alebo žiariaci efekt: Svietiaci v tme; LED/svietiaci; Bez efektu; Reflexný; Iné
nb: Reflekterende eller glødende effekt: Selvlysende; LED / med lys; Ingen effekt; Reflekterende; Annet